Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.545

Climate resiliency account.

The climate resiliency account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are dedicated to activities that increase climate resiliency and include, but are not limited to:

(1) Response to climate driven stressors;

(2) Prevention of environmental and natural resources degradation;

(3) Activities that restore or improve ecosystem resiliency and sustainability; and

(4) Measures that anticipate, adapt, or minimize the effects climate change has on communities and the natural environment.

[ 2020 c 357 s 924.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 357: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 3, 2020]." [ 2020 c 357 s 926.]